Utah statutes.
35A-8-1005.   Distribution of Community Services Block Grant funds.

Community Services Block Grant funds received by the office shall be distributed as follows:

(1)  90% to community action agencies;

(2)  5% to:

(a)  organizations with a statewide focus to accomplish specific objectives that complement the Community Services Block Grant poverty programs;

(b)  provide training and technical assistance for grantees of Community Services Block Grant funds; or

(c)  supplement anti-poverty projects; and

(3)  5% to reimburse costs incurred by the office in administration of this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

